Arkansas, session 2025, HB1815.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) The United States Senate Committee on Armed Services, Sen.
Rep. No. 115-262, at 192 (2018), expressed concern about the ability of the
United Staes Department of Defense to “protect or provide justice to the
children of service members when [the children] are sexually assaulted by
other children” in the United States Department of Defense schools or on
military bases;
(2) The United States Deputy Secretary of Defense issued a
memorandum directing the secretaries of the military departments to seek
concurrent jurisdiction with states to remove barriers preventing access to
juvenile justice in areas of exclusive federal jurisdiction, including
military bases within the United States;
(3) The United States Department of Defense seeks to allow state
*LJH164*
03-31-2025 12:16:42 LJH164

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 HB1815
legislatures to extend concurrent jurisdiction over juvenile justice matters
on military bases; and
(4) Amendment of the Arkansas Code's provisions related to the
state's jurisdiction over juvenile justice matters is necessary to allow for
investigation and adjudication over cases referred to this state by the
United States Government.
(b) The General Assembly intends this act to:
(1) Extend the state's jurisdiction over juvenile justice to
places of exclusive federal jurisdiction;
(2) Require the Legislative Council to approve extensions of
concurrent jurisdiction when the General Assembly is not in session; and
(3) Require reciprocal agreements between the United States
Department of Defense and the state, a county, or a municipal government to
be filed with the county clerk where the reciprocal agreement was made and to
be compiled by the Attorney General.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 9-27-306, is amended to add an additional
subsection to read as follows:
(g) When concurrent jurisdiction has been established under § 22-7-
102, the circuit court or the juvenile division of circuit court has
exclusive jurisdiction over any case involving a juvenile who is alleged to
be delinquent as the result of an act committed within the boundaries of a
military installation that is a crime under state law.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 22-7-101 is amended to read as follows:
22-7-101. Purchase of real property by United States — Limited cession
of jurisdiction — Right to tax — Local agreements authorized.
(a) The State of Arkansas consents to the purchase by the United
States of any site or ground for the erection of any armory, arsenal, fort,
fortification, navy yard, customhouse, lighthouse, lock, dam, fish hatchery,
or other public buildings of any kind.
(b) The jurisdiction of this state within and over all grounds
purchased by the United States within the limits of this state is ceded to
the United States, except that: this cession of jurisdiction shall not
prevent execution of any process of this state, civil or criminal, upon any
person who may be on these grounds
03-31-2025 12:16:42 LJH164

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 HB1815
(1) There shall be juvenile justice jurisdiction for the
investigation and adjudication of cases referred to this state by the United
States in exercising concurrent jurisdiction with the state; and
(2) In the event that the United States Government acquires
grounds expanding an existing installation, the legislative jurisdiction of
the newly acquired grounds shall have the same legislative jurisdiction as
the existing federal installation.
(c) This state releases and relinquishes its right to tax any site,
grounds, or real estate, and all improvements which may be there or erected
there during the time the United States remains the owner thereof.
(d)(1) Upon the establishment of exclusive or concurrent jurisdiction,
any state, county, or municipal authority may enter into a reciprocal
agreement, including without limitation a memorandum of understanding, with
any agency of the United States for the coordination and designation of
services and juridical responsibilities related to the respective federal
installation.
(2) A state, county, or municipal authority shall file an
agreement entered under subdivision (d)(1) of this section with the county
clerk in the county that the federal installation is located and include a
copy provided to and compiled by the Attorney General for each federal
installation.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 22-7-102(b), concerning transfer of
jurisdiction and transmission of notice among the branches of state
government, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) The Governor shall transmit the notice, together with his or
her comments and recommendations, if any, and the comments and
recommendations of the Attorney General, if any, to the next session of the
General Assembly if in session, or the Legislative Council when the General
Assembly is not in session, which shall be constitutionally competent to
consider the notice, comments, and recommendations.
(2) Unless prior to the expiration of the legislative session to
which the notice is transmitted the General Assembly has adopted an act
approving the transfer of legislative jurisdiction as proposed in the notice,
the transfer shall not be effective.

03-31-2025 12:16:42 LJH164

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 HB1815
/s/Perry



































03-31-2025 12:16:42 LJH164